Tennessee, session 114, HB1838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-6001(b)(4)(A), is amended by
deleting "each high school senior" and substituting "each student in any of the grades nine
through twelve (9-12)" and deleting "in the 2023-2024 school year, and each subsequent school
year" and substituting "each school year".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-8-203, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(n) The board of regents shall establish a standard framework for each institution
governed by the board to provide transcribable credit to a student who earned a
credential on a nationally recognized career readiness assessment administered to the
student in high school pursuant to § 49-6-6001(b)(4) that may be applied toward the
student's attainment of a postsecondary degree.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1838
010438
- 1 -